South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4710.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 47-1-40(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) This section does not apply to: (1) fowl,; (2) accepted animal husbandry practices of farm operations and the training of animals,; (3) the practice of veterinary medicine,; (4) agricultural practices including, but not limited to, alteration of livestock or poultry to conform with breed or other show standards, dehorning cattle within standards provided by the South Carolina Department of Agriculture,; (5) forestry and silvacultural practices,; (6) wildlife management practices, or activity authorized by Title 50, including an activity authorized by the South Carolina Department of Natural Resources or an exercise designed for training dogs for hunting, if repeated contact with a dog or dogs and another animal does not occur during this training exercise; (7) lawful activities conducted for the primary purpose of providing food for human or animal consumption; (8) lawful taking of game pursuant to Title 50; (9) lawful scientific or medical research; (10) zoological operations to include exhibitions; (11) national or state organization-sanctioned competitions; (12) law enforcement duties, including dog, animal, or rabies control officer duties; (13) humane society operations; (14) private landowners protecting property; (15) defending against any perceived imminent threat of any injury or damage to any person, other animal, or property; (16) any simulated fight as part of a motion picture, video, or other digital filming or live artistic performance; and (17) pest control practices by a licensed pest control professional. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----